District of Columbia statutes.
44-1102.01

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-212, § 201, 43 DCR 4962
July 12, 2001, D.C. Law 14-18, § 9(a), 48 DCR 4047
1981 Ed., § 32-262.1.
For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 44-1101.01.